Tennessee, session 114, SB2523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-602(a)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivision (A) and substituting:
(A) Knowingly, directly, or indirectly access, cause to be accessed, or attempt to
access any telephone system, telecommunications facility, computer software, computer
program, data, computer, computer system, computer network, cloud computing service,
or any part thereof, for the purpose of:
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2523
012054
- 1 -